Utah statutes.
10-19-202.   Renewable energy certificate -- Use to satisfy other requirements.

(1)  A municipal electric utility may buy, sell, trade, or otherwise transfer a renewable energy certificate issued or recognized under Section 54-17-603.

(2)  For the purpose of satisfying Subsection 10-19-201(1) and the issuance of a renewable energy certificate under Section 54-17-603:

(a)  a renewable energy source located in this state that derives its energy from solar photovoltaic and solar thermal energy shall be credited for 2.4 kilowatt-hours of qualifying electricity for each 1.0 kilowatt-hour generated; and

(b)  if two or more municipal electric utilities jointly own a renewable energy resource, each municipal electric utility shall be credited with 1.0 kilowatt-hour of qualifying electricity for 1.0 kilowatt-hour of the renewable energy resource allocated to the municipal electric utility by contract, unless the contract otherwise provides.

(3)  A renewable energy certificate:

(a)  may be used only once to satisfy Subsection 10-19-201(1);

(b)  may be used to satisfy Subsection 10-19-201(1) and the qualifying electricity on which the renewable energy certificate is based may be used to satisfy any federal renewable energy requirement; and

(c)  may not be used if it has been used to satisfy any other state's renewable energy requirement.



Enacted by Chapter 374, 2008 General Session

